Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2712
Residence in foreclosure, defined.

Residence in foreclosure means a residence or dwelling that is occupied as the homeowner's principal place of residence and against which any type of foreclosure action, including, but not limited to, the filing of a notice of default of a deed of trust or the filing of a lawsuit to foreclose a mortgage or other lien, has been commenced.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 12.
July 18, 2008